Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1615.01
Tax list; use of electronic data processing equipment; levy and collection of taxes.

The county board of any county is authorized to direct that for all purposes of assessment of property, and for the levy and collection of taxes and special assessments, there shall be used tax records or random access devices suitable for use in connection with electronic data processing equipment or other mechanical office equipment, in accordance with procedures to be approved by the Property Tax Administrator. Such county board is also authorized to direct that a statement of taxes and special assessments be mailed or otherwise delivered to the person, firm, association, or corporation against whom such taxes are assessed. Failure to receive such statement shall not relieve the taxpayer from any liability to pay such taxes or assessments and penalties accrued thereon.

Laws 1965, c. 464, § 1, p. 1475;

Laws 1969, c. 676, § 1, p. 2601;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 161.